North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 4. Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act.
§ 135-58.
Service retirement benefits.

Any member who retires under the provisions of subsection (a) or subsection (c) of

G.S. 135-57

before July 1, 1990, after he either has attained his sixty-fifth birthday or has completed 24 years or more of creditable service shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence
on the effective date of his retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter during his lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of (1), (2) and (3) following, provided that in no event
shall the annual allowance payable to any member be greater than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which he is entitled under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement
System or the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional mode of payment) would total three fourths of his final compensation:

Four percent (4%) of his final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals;

Three and one-half percent (3 1/2%) of his final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court or as administrative officer of the courts;

Three percent (3%) of his final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, or clerk of superior court.

(a1) Any member who retires under the provisions of subsection (a) or subsection (c) of

G.S. 135-57

on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 1999, after he either has attained his 65th birthday or has completed 24 years or more of creditable service shall receive an annual retirement allowance,
payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of his retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter during his lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of
(1), (2), and (3) following, provided that in no event shall the annual allowance payable to any member be greater than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which he is entitled under the Teachers’
and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System or the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional
mode of payment) would total three-fourths of his final compensation:

(1) Four and two-hundredths percent (4.02%) of his final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals;

(2) Three and fifty-two hundredths percent (3.52%) of his final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court or as administrative officer of the courts;

(3) Three and two-hundredths percent (3.02%) of his final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, or clerk of superior court.

(a2) Any member who retires under the provisions of G.S. 135-57(a) or G.S. 135-57(c) on or after July 1, 1999, but before July 1, 2001, after the member has either attained the member’s 65th birthday or has completed 24 years or more of creditable service,
shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of the member’s retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter during the member’s
lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of the amounts in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) following, provided that in no event shall the annual allowance payable to any member be greater
than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which the member is entitled under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, or the Local Governmental Employees’
Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional mode of payment) would total three-fourths of the member’s final compensation:

(1) Four and two-hundredths percent (4.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals;

(2) Three and fifty-two hundredths percent (3.52%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court or as Administrative Officer of the Courts;

(3) Three and two-hundredths percent (3.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service, rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, or clerk of superior court;

A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes using an average final compensation as defined in G.S. 135-53(2a) and creditable service equal to the number
of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in

G.S. 135-56

; and

A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter using an average final compensation as defined in G.S. 135-53(2a) and creditable service equal to the number of years of the member’s
creditable service that was transferred from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in

G.S. 135-56

.

(a3) Any member who retires under the provisions of G.S. 135-57(a) or G.S. 135-57(c) on or after July 1, 2001, but before January 1, 2004, after the member has either attained the member’s 65th birthday or has completed 24 years or more of creditable
service, shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of the member’s retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter during the
member’s lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of the amounts in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) following, provided that in no event shall the annual allowance payable to any member be
greater than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which the member is entitled under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, or the Local Governmental
Employees’ Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional mode of payment) would total three-fourths of the member’s final compensation:

(1) Four and two-hundredths percent (4.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals;

(2) Three and fifty-two hundredths percent (3.52%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court or as Administrative Officer of the Courts;

(3) Three and two-hundredths percent (3.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service, rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, or clerk of superior court;

(4) A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes using an average final compensation as defined in G.S. 135-53(2a) and creditable service equal to the
number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56; and

(5) A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter using an average final compensation as defined in G.S. 135-53(2a) and creditable service, including any sick leave standing to
the credit of the member, equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56.

(a4) Any member who retires under the provisions of G.S. 135-57(a) or G.S. 135-57(c) on or after January 1, 2004, but before July 1, 2007, after the member has either attained the member’s 65th birthday or has completed 24 years or more of creditable
service, shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of the member’s retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter during the
member’s lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of the amounts in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection, provided that in no event shall the annual allowance payable to any
member be greater than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which the member is entitled under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, or the Local
Governmental Employees’ Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional mode of payment), would total three-fourths of the member’s final compensation:

(1) Four and two hundredths percent (4.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals;

(2)
Three and fifty-two hundredths percent (3.52%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court or as Administrative
Officer of the Courts;

(3)
Three and two hundredths percent (3.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, or clerk
of superior court;

(4)
A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes using an average final compensation as defined in G.S.
135-53(2a) and creditable service equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56;
and

(5)
A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter of the General Statutes using an average final compensation as defined in G.S.
135-53(2a) and creditable service, including any sick leave standing to the credit of the member, equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Teachers’ and State Employees’
Retirement System or the Legislative Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56.

(a5)
Any member who retires under the provisions of G.S. 135-57(a) or G.S. 135-57(c) on or after July 1, 2007, but before July 1, 2008, after the member has either attained the member’s 65th birthday or has
completed 24 years or more of creditable service, shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of the member’s retirement and shall be continued on the first
day of each month thereafter during the member’s lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of the amounts in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection, provided that in no event shall
the annual allowance payable to any member be greater than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which the member is entitled under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative
Retirement System, or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional mode of payment), would total three-fourths of the member’s final
compensation:

(1)
Four and two hundredths percent (4.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of
Appeals;

(2)
Three and fifty-two hundredths percent (3.52%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court or as Administrative
Officer of the Courts;

(3)
Three and two hundredths percent (3.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, clerk
of superior court, or public defender;

(4)
A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes using an average final compensation as defined in G.S.
135-53(2a) and creditable service equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56;
and

(5)
A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter using an average final compensation as defined in G.S. 135-53(2a) and creditable
service, including any sick leave standing to the credit of the member, equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System
or the Legislative Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56.

(a6)
Any member who retires under the provisions of G.S. 135-57(a) or G.S. 135-57(c) on or after July 1, 2008, after the member has either attained the member’s 65th birthday or has completed 24 years or more
of creditable service, shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of the member’s retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter
during the member’s lifetime, the amount of which shall be computed as the sum of the amounts in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection, provided that in no event shall the annual allowance payable
to any member be greater than an amount which, when added to the allowance, if any, to which the member is entitled under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, or the
Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System (prior in any case to any reduction for early retirement or for an optional mode of payment), would total three-fourths of the member’s final compensation:

(1)
Four and two hundredths percent (4.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a justice of the Supreme Court, a judge of the Court of
Appeals, or the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts;

(2)
Three and fifty-two hundredths percent (3.52%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the superior court;

(3)
Three and two hundredths percent (3.02%) of the member’s final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service rendered as a judge of the district court, district attorney, clerk
of superior court, public defender, or the Director of Indigent Defense Services;

(4)
A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes using an average final compensation as defined in G.S.
135-53(2a) and creditable service equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56;
and

(5)
A service retirement allowance computed in accordance with the service retirement provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter using an average final compensation as defined in G.S. 135-53(2a) and creditable
service, including any sick leave standing to the credit of the member, equal to the number of years of the member’s creditable service that was transferred from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System
or the Legislative Retirement System to this System as provided in G.S. 135-56.

Any member who retires under the provisions of subsection (a) or subsection (c) of

G.S. 135-57

before he either has attained his sixty-fifth birthday or has completed 24 years of creditable service shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the effective date of
his retirement and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter during his lifetime, the amount of which shall be determined in the same manner and be subject to the same maximum limitation as provided for in subsection
(a) above except that the allowance so computed shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the member’s retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next
following the earlier of

The member’s sixty-fifth birthday or

The date the member would have completed 24 years of creditable service if he had been in membership service from his retirement date until such date.

For the sole purpose of determining whether a member has completed the required 24 years of creditable service referred to in this subsection (b) or the date on which he would have completed such period of creditable service if he had remained in membership
service, in the case of a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System who became a member of this Retirement System under circumstances described in

G.S. 135-28.1

, and who at the time of his retirement hereunder is in service and has retained his membership in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System as provided for in

G.S. 135-28.1

, his creditable service shall be taken as the sum of his creditable service hereunder plus the amount of creditable service remaining to his credit in such other system as provided for in G.S. 135-28.1.

The foregoing subsections of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, in no event will the retirement allowance payable at any time to a retired member who was a member of a previous system immediately prior to January 1, 1974, prior to any reduction
of such allowance in accordance with

G.S. 135-61

, be less than the retirement allowance to which he would have been entitled under the terms of such previous system if this Article had not been enacted.

Commencing with the payment for the month of January 1974, the retirement allowance of each retired member of a previous system who was in receipt of a retirement allowance thereunder as of January 1, 1974, shall be paid from the assets of the Retirement
System in the same amount as would have been applicable for January 1974, if this Article had not been enacted.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in no event will the retirement allowance payable at any time to a retired member who was a member of a previous system immediately prior to January 1, 1974, prior to any reduction of such allowance
in accordance with

G.S. 135-61

, be greater than the retirement allowance to which he would have been entitled under the terms of such previous system if this Article had not been enacted or than the retirement allowance to which he would have
been entitled under this Article if he had not been entitled to benefits under the terms of such previous system, whichever is larger.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1977, c. 1120, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, ss. 17, 18; c. 1109, ss. 13.14, 13.15; 1985, c. 649, s. 7; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1077, ss. 6, 7; 1999-237, s. 28.24(d), (e); 2001-424, s. 32.29(a),
(b); 2003-284, s. 30.18(g), (h); 2005-276, s. 29.30A(f), (g); 2005-345, s. 42; 2007-323, s. 28.21B(f), (g); 2008-107, s. 26.24(f), (g); 2015-241, s. 30.3(g).

§ 135-59.
Disability retirement.

Upon application by or on behalf of the member, any member in service who has completed five or more years of creditable service and who has not attained his sixty-fifth birthday may be retired by the Board of Trustees, on the first day of any calendar
month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days next following the date of filing such application, on a disability retirement allowance; provided, that the medical board, after a medical examination of such member, shall certify
that such member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, that such incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment and has been continuous thereafter, that such incapacity is likely
to be permanent, and that such member should be retired; and, provided further, that if a member is removed by the Supreme Court for mental or physical incapacity under the provisions of

G.S. 7A-376

, no action is required by the medical board under this section and, provided further, the medical board shall determine if the member is able to engage in gainful employment and, if so, the member shall still be
retired and the disability retirement allowance as a result thereof shall be reduced as in G.S. 135-60(d). Provided further, that the medical board shall not certify any member as disabled who:

Applies for disability retirement based upon a mental or physical incapacity which existed when the member first established membership in the system; or

Is in receipt of any payments on account of the same disability which existed when the member first established membership in the system.The Board of Trustees shall require each employee upon enrolling in the Retirement System to provide information on
the membership application concerning any mental or physical incapacities existing at the time the member enrolls.Notwithstanding the foregoing to the contrary, any beneficiary who commenced retirement with an early or
service retirement benefit has the right, within three years of this retirement, to convert to an allowance with disability retirement benefits without modification of any election of optional allowance previously made;
provided, the beneficiary presents clear and convincing evidence that the beneficiary would have met all applicable requirements for disability retirement benefits while still in service as a member. The allowance on account
of disability retirement benefits to the beneficiary shall be retroactive to the effective date of early or service retirement.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the surviving spouse of a deceased member who has met all other requirements for disability retirement benefits, except whose death occurred before the first day of the calendar month in which the member’s disability retirement
allowance was due and payable, and who was the designated beneficiary for a return of accumulated contributions and the final compensation death benefit as provided in

G.S. 135-63

, shall be paid in lieu of the return of accumulated contributions and the final compensation death benefit a monthly allowance equal to a reduced retirement allowance provided by a fifty percent (50%) joint and
survivorship option, plus the allowance payable to a former member’s surviving spouse, in the manner prescribed under

G.S. 135-64

as though the former member had commenced retirement the first day of the month following his death.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1981, c. 689, s. 3; c. 940, s. 2; 1985, c. 479, ss. 192(b), 194; 1987, c. 513, s. 1; 2009-66, s. 3(f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 3(f), effective July 1, 2009, substituted “120 days” for “90 days” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).

§ 135-60.
Disability retirement benefits.

Upon retirement for disability in accordance with

G.S. 135-59

, a member shall receive a disability retirement allowance computed and payable as provided for service retirement in G.S. 135-58(a2) except that the member’s creditable service shall be taken as the creditable service
he would have had had he continued in service to the earliest date he could have retired on an unreduced service retirement allowance as a member in the same division of the General Court of Justice in which he was serving on his
disability retirement date.

Once each year during the first five years following retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance, and once in every three-year period thereafter, the Board of Trustees may, and upon his application shall, require any disability beneficiary
who has not yet attained his sixtieth birthday to undergo a medical examination, such examination to be made at the place of residence of the beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon, by a physician or physicians designated
by the Board of Trustees. Should any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained his sixtieth birthday refuse to submit to at least one medical examination in any such year by a physician or physicians designated by the Board
of Trustees, his allowance may be discontinued until his withdrawal of such refusal, and should his refusal continue for one year, it shall be assumed that he is no longer disabled.

Should the medical board certify to the Board of Trustees that a disability beneficiary prior to his sixty-fifth birthday has recovered to the extent that he would not satisfy the requirements for disability retirement if he were an active member of the
Retirement System, or if his disability shall be assumed to have terminated in accordance with subsection (b) above, his disability retirement allowance shall thereupon cease, he shall be restored as a member of the Retirement
System, and the period during which he was in receipt of a disability retirement allowance shall not be included in his creditable service.

The Board of Trustees shall determine whether a disability beneficiary is engaged in or is able to engage in a gainful occupation paying more than the difference, as hereinafter indexed, between his disability retirement allowance and the gross compensation
earned as an employee during the 12 consecutive months in the final 48 months of service prior to retirement producing the highest gross compensation excluding any compensation received on account of termination. If the disability
beneficiary is earning or is able to earn more than the difference, the portion of his disability retirement allowance not provided by his contributions shall be reduced to an amount which, together with the portion of the disability
retirement allowance provided by his contributions and the amount earnable by him shall equal the amount of his gross compensation prior to retirement. This difference shall be increased on January 1 of each year by the percentage
change between the December Consumer Price Index in the year prior to retirement and the December Consumer Price Index in the year most recently ended, calculated to the nearest tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), provided that
this percentage change is positive. Should the earning capacity of the disability beneficiary later change, the portion of his disability retirement allowance not provided by his contributions may be further modified. In lieu of
the reductions on account of a disability beneficiary earning more than the aforesaid difference, he may elect to convert his disability retirement allowance to a service retirement allowance calculated on the basis of his final
compensation and creditable service at the time of disability retirement and his age at the time of conversion to service retirement. This election is irrevocable.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1981, c. 975, s. 4; c. 980, s. 5; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, s. 19; 1999-237, s. 28.24(g); 2014-97, s. 4(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-97, s. 4(h), effective January 1, 2015, rewrote the third sentence in subsection (d).

§ 135-61.
Election of optional allowance.

Any member who retires under the provisions of this Article shall have the right to elect to have his allowance payable under any one of the optional forms provided for in G.S. 135-5(g), subject to the conditions therein contained, in lieu of the allowance
that would otherwise be payable.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1.

§ 135-62.
Return of accumulated contributions.

Should a member cease membership service otherwise than by death or retirement under the provisions of this Article, he shall, upon submission of an application, be paid, not earlier than 60 days from the date of termination of service, his contributions
and the accumulated regular interest thereon, provided that he has not in the meantime returned to service as a judge. Upon payment of such accumulated contributions his membership in the Retirement System shall cease and, if he
thereafter again becomes a member, no credit shall be allowed for any service previously rendered, except as otherwise provided in G.S. 135-56(b). Any such payment of a member’s accumulated contributions shall be in full and complete
discharge of any rights in or to any benefits otherwise payable under this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 531, s. 7.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1981, c. 672, s. 4; 1983, c. 467; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, s. 20; 1993, c. 531, s. 7; 2014-88, s. 2(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-88, s. 2(d), effective January 1, 2015, deleted “if he has attained at least five years of membership service or if termination of his membership service is involuntary as certified by the employer” following “his contributions” in the
first sentence of subsection (a).

§ 135-63.
Benefits on death before retirement.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a member in service, there shall be paid in a lump sum to such person as the member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees
or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person is living at the time of the member’s death, otherwise to the member’s legal representatives, a death benefit equal to the sum of
(i) the member’s accumulated contributions, plus (ii) the member’s final compensation; provided, however, that if the member has attained his or her fiftieth birthday with at least five years of membership service at the member’s
date of death, and if the designated recipient of the death benefits is the member’s spouse who survives him or her, and if the spouse so elects, then the lump-sum death benefit provided for herein shall consist only of a payment
equal to the member’s final compensation and there shall be paid to the surviving spouse an annual retirement allowance, payable monthly, which shall commence on the first day of the calendar month coinciding with or next following
the death of the member and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter until the remarriage or death of the spouse. The amount of any such retirement allowance shall be equal to one half of the amount of the retirement
allowance to which the member would have been entitled had the member retired under the provisions of G.S. 135-57(a) on the first day of the calendar month coinciding with or next following the member’s date of death, reduced by
two percent (2%) thereof for each full year, if any, by which the age of the member at his or her date of death exceeds that of the member’s spouse. If the retirement allowance to the spouse shall terminate on the remarriage or
death of the spouse before the total of the retirement allowance payments made equals the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions at date of death, the excess of such accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement
allowances paid to the spouse shall be paid in a lump sum to such person as the member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed
with the Board of Trustees, if such person is living at the time such payment falls due, otherwise to the former member’s legal representatives.

There shall be paid to the surviving unremarried spouse of any former judge who died in service prior to January 1, 1974, and after his forty-ninth birthday an annual retirement allowance which shall commence on January 1, 1974, and shall be continued
on the first day of each month thereafter until the remarriage or death of the spouse. The amount of any such retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) above as if the provisions
of this Article had been in effect on the date of death of the former judge, and the final compensation of such former judge had been equal to the rate of annual compensation in effect on December 31, 1973, for the office held
by the former judge at the time of his death.

Upon receipt of proof, satisfactory to the Board of Trustees, of the death of a member not in service, there shall be paid in a lump sum to such person as the member shall have nominated by electronic submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees
or by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if such person is living at the time of the member’s death, otherwise to the member’s legal representatives, a death benefit equal to the member’s
accumulated contributions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 7A-376

, there shall be paid to the surviving spouse of any former judge whose death occurred prior to July 1, 1983, who had not withdrawn his contributions pursuant to

G.S. 135-62

, an annual retirement allowance which shall commence on July 1, 1983, and shall be continued on the first day of each month thereafter until the death or remarriage of the spouse. If the spouse dies or remarries
before the total of the retirement allowance paid equals the amount of the former judge’s accumulated contributions, the excess of the accumulated contributions over the total of the retirement allowance paid to the spouse shall
be paid in a lump sum to the person the spouse has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board of Trustees, if the person is living at the time the payment falls due, otherwise to the spouse’s legal
representative. The amount of any such retirement allowance shall be computed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) above. This subsection does not authorize allowances to surviving spouses of former judges convicted
of crimes related to the performance of their judicial duties.

For purposes of this subsection, a participant whose employment is interrupted by reason of service in the Uniformed Services, as that term is defined in section 4303(16) of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, Public Law 103-353,
shall be deemed to be “in service” until the last day of such service in the Uniformed Services. If the participant does not return immediately after that service to employment with a covered employer in this System, then the participant
shall be deemed “in service” until the date on which the participant was first eligible to be separated or released from his or her involuntary military service.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; c. 1385; 1983, c. 761, ss. 231, 234; 2009-66, ss. 6(c), 11(a), (b); 2017-129, s. 3(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, ss. 6(c), and 11(a) and (b), effective July 1, 2009, in subsection (a), inserted “electronic submission prior to completing 10 years of service in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by” in the first sentence, and “electronic
submission in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by” in the last sentence; in subsection (c), inserted “electronic submission prior to completing 10 years of service in a form approved by the Board of Trustees or by”; and
added subsection (e).

Session Laws 2017-129, s. 3(c), effective January 1, 2018, in subsection (a), made gender-neautralizing changes throughout, and deleted “prior to completing 10 years of service” following “electronic submission” near the beginning, and in subsection (c).